Maryland, session 2026, HB1331.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
15–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(h) “Program” means the Maryland Medical Assistance Program.
(i) “Program recipient” means an individual who receives benefits under the
Program.
15–123.1.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH MEMORANDUMS OF
UNDERSTANDING WITH FEDERAL AND STATE AGENCIES TO FACILITATE
DATA–SHARING IN ORDER TO CONDUCT:
(1) MONTHLY DEATH RECORD REVIEWS, USING THE VITAL
STATISTICS ADMINISTRATION DATABASE TO IDENTIFY DECEASED INDIVIDUALS
WHO ARE PROGRAM RECIPIENTS;
(2) QUARTERLY REVIEWS, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE MARYLAND
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR, TO DETERMINE THE EFFECT OF EMPLOYMENT OR WAGE
CHANGES ON THE CONTINUING ELIGIBILITY OF PROGRAM RECIPIENTS;

HOUSE BILL 1331 3
(3) QUARTERLY REVIEWS OF TAX FILINGS FROM THE COMPTROLLER
TO VERIFY EMPLOYMENT, INCOME, AND RESIDENCY CHANGES OF PROGRAM
RECIPIENTS;
(4) ANNUAL REVIEWS OF INFORMATION FROM THE INTERNAL
REVENUE SERVICE THAT MAY AFFECT THE ELIGIBILITY OF PROGRAM RECIPIENTS,
INCLUDING:
(I) TAX FILINGS;
(II) ADJUSTED GROSS INCOME DATA; AND
(III) FAMILY COMPOSITION DATA;
(5) NOTWITHSTANDING § 15–113 OF THIS SUBTITLE, MONTHLY
REVIEWS OF INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND CORRECTIONAL SERVICES, TO ENSURE
THAT INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS ARE NOT RECEIVING BENEFITS UNDER THE
PROGRAM;
(6) MONTHLY REVIEWS OF INFORMATION FROM THE FEDERAL
SOCIAL SECURITY ADMINISTRATION THAT MAY AFFECT THE ELIGIBILITY OF
PROGRAM RECIPIENTS, INCLUDING:
(I) INCOME INFORMATION;
(II) DEATH REGISTER INFORMATION;
(III) INCARCERATION RECORDS;
(IV) SUPPLEMENTAL SECURITY INCOME INFORMATION;
(V) BENEFICIARY RECORDS; AND
(VI) PENSION INFORMATION;
(7) TWICE MONTHLY REVIEWS OF UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE
BENEFITS RECORDS, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF
LABOR, TO VERIFY CHANGES IN EMPLOYMENT OR INCOME THAT MIGHT AFFECT THE
CONTINUING ELIGIBILITY OF PROGRAM RECIPIENTS USING:
(I) SOCIAL SECURITY ADMINISTRATION EARNINGS AND DEATH
RECORDS;

HOUSE BILL 1331
(II) U.S. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
NATIONAL DIRECTORY OF NEW HIRES;
(III) U.S. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
CHILD SUPPORT ENFORCEMENT RECORDS;
(IV) U.S. DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND URBAN
DEVELOPMENT PAYMENT AND EARNINGS DATA; AND
(V) FEDERAL BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION NATIONAL INSTANT
CRIMINAL BACKGROUND CHECK SYSTEM RECORDS OF FUGITIVES FROM JUSTICE;
(8) MONTHLY REVIEWS OF ADDRESS INFORMATION TO DETERMINE
PROGRAM RECIPIENT RESIDENCY THAT MAY AFFECT CONTINUING ELIGIBILITY OF
PROGRAM RECIPIENTS USING:
(I) RETURNED MAIL;
(II) U.S. POSTAL SERVICE CHANGE OF ADDRESS DATA; AND
(III) MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION ENROLLEE ADDRESS DATA;
(9) MONTHLY REVIEWS, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT
OF HUMAN SERVICES, OF OUT–OF–STATE ELECTRONIC BENEFITS TRANSFER CARD
TRANSACTIONS TO VERIFY THAT INDIVIDUALS RECEIVING PUBLIC ASSISTANCE
RESIDE IN THE STATE; AND
(10) QUARTERLY REVIEWS OF COMPLIANCE WITH THE WORK
REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED UNDER § 15–123.3 OF THIS SUBTITLE USING:
(I) WAGE AND INCOME DATA;
(II) EDUCATIONAL TRAINING PROGRAM ENROLLMENT DATA;
AND
(III) VOLUNTEER SERVICE DOCUMENTATION.
(B) UNLESS OTHERWISE PROHIBITED BY FEDERAL LAW, AT LEAST ONCE
EVERY 6 MONTHS, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CONDUCT ELIGIBILITY
REDETERMINATIONS FOR ALL NONELDERLY ADULT PROGRAM RECIPIENTS WHOSE
ELIGIBILITY IS DETERMINED BASED ON THE APPLICATION OF MODIFIED ADJUSTED
GROSS INCOME STANDARDS.

HOUSE BILL 1331 5
(C) THE DEPARTMENT MAY CONTRACT WITH A THIRD PARTY TO CONDUCT
PUBLIC AND PRIVATE DATABASE SEARCHES FOR INFORMATION THAT INDICATES A
CHANGE IN CIRCUMSTANCES THAT MAY AFFECT PROGRAM ELIGIBILITY.
(D) UNLESS REQUIRED BY FEDERAL LAW, WHEN DETERMINING PROGRAM
ELIGIBILITY, THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT ACCEPT SELF–ATTESTATION OF
INFORMATION FOR PURPOSES OF DETERMINING:
(1) INCOME;
(2) IDENTITY;
(3) RESIDENCY;
(4) HOUSEHOLD COMPOSITION;
(5) CITIZENSHIP STATUS;
(6) IMMIGRATION STATUS;
(7) EDUCATION OR TRAINING PROGRAM ENROLLMENT;
(8) VOLUNTEER SERVICE; OR
(9) OTHER ELIGIBILITY FACTORS.
(E) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL SEEK APPROVAL FROM THE CENTERS FOR
MEDICARE AND MEDICAID SERVICES FOR A § 1115 WAIVER TO IMPOSE A 6–MONTH
LOCKOUT PERIOD FOR A PROGRAM RECIPIENT WHO:
(1) IS AT LEAST 19 YEARS OLD AND UNDER THE AGE OF 65 YEARS;
(2) FAILS TO REPORT A CHANGE IN ELIGIBILITY; AND
(3) IS NOT:
(I) DESIGNATED AS DISABLED BY A GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY;
OR
(II) PREGNANT.

HOUSE BILL 1331
(F) THE DEPARTMENT AND THE STATE LOTTERY AND GAMING CONTROL
AGENCY SHALL ENTER INTO AN AGREEMENT TO IDENTIFY THE NAMES OF EACH
PROGRAM RECIPIENT WHO HAS WON A PRIZE OF $600 OR MORE.
(G) BEGINNING ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2029, ON A MONTHLY BASIS,
THE DEPARTMENT SHALL SUBMIT PROGRAM RECIPIENT INFORMATION TO THE
CENTERS FOR MEDICARE AND MEDICAID SERVICES NATIONAL MEDICAID
ENROLLMENT DATABASE TO IDENTIFY INDIVIDUALS ENROLLED IN MEDICAID IN
MULTIPLE STATES AT THE SAME TIME.
(H) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PUBLISH ON ITS WEBSITE QUARTERLY
REPORTS ON INVESTIGATIONS AND COMPLIANCE FINDINGS RELATING TO PROGRAM
FRAUD, INCLUDING:
(1) THE NUMBER OF CASES INVESTIGATED;
(2) THE NUMBER OF CASES REFERRED FOR PROSECUTION; AND
(3) THE PERCENTAGE OF INELIGIBLE PROGRAM RECIPIENTS
IDENTIFIED.
(I) (1) ON OR BEFORE AUGUST 31 EACH YEAR, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
REPORT TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, ON:
(I) THE NUMBER OF PROGRAM RECIPIENTS DISENROLLED
FROM THE PROGRAM FOLLOWING A REVIEW OF ADDRESS CHANGE INFORMATION OR
OUT–OF–STATE ELECTRONIC BENEFIT TRANSACTIONS;
(II) THE NUMBER OF PROGRAM RECIPIENTS DISENROLLED
FROM THE PROGRAM DUE TO ENROLLMENT IN MULTIPLE STATES; AND
(III) THE ESTIMATED FISCAL IMPACT TO THE STATE AS A
RESULT OF DISENROLLING THE PROGRAM RECIPIENTS DESCRIBED UNDER ITEMS
(I) AND (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH FROM THE PROGRAM.
(2) THE REPORT SHALL BE MADE PUBLICLY AVAILABLE ON THE
DEPARTMENT’S WEBSITE.
(J) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SECTION.
15–123.2.

HOUSE BILL 1331 7
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “EXPANSION POPULATION” MEANS INDIVIDUALS WHO ARE
ELIGIBLE TO PARTICIPATE IN THE PROGRAM UNDER § 1902(A)(10)(A)(I)(VIII) OF
THE FEDERAL SOCIAL SECURITY ACT, COMMONLY KNOWN AS THE MEDICAID
EXPANSION POPULATION UNDER THE AFFORDABLE CARE ACT.
(3) “NONEXPANSION POPULATION” MEANS ALL INDIVIDUALS
ELIGIBLE TO PARTICIPATE IN THE PROGRAM WHO DO NOT QUALIFY UNDER THE
EXPANSION POPULATION, INCLUDING PREGNANT WOMEN, CHILDREN, ELDERLY
INDIVIDUALS, AND INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES.
(4) “RETROACTIVE ELIGIBILITY” MEANS PROGRAM COVERAGE FOR
SERVICES PROVIDED BEFORE THE MONTH OF APPLICATION AS AUTHORIZED BY 42
U.S.C. § 1396(A)(34).
(B) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL LIMIT RETROACTIVE ELIGIBILITY FOR
INITIAL PROGRAM APPLICANTS TO:
(I) FOR INDIVIDUALS DETERMINED TO BE ELIGIBLE AS PART
OF THE EXPANSION POPULATION, 1 MONTH BEFORE THE MONTH IN WHICH THE
INDIVIDUAL SUBMITS AN APPLICATION; AND
(II) FOR INDIVIDUALS ELIGIBLE AS PART OF THE
NONEXPANSION POPULATION, 2 MONTHS BEFORE THE MONTH IN WHICH THE
INDIVIDUAL SUBMITS AN APPLICATION.
(2) THE LIMITATIONS ESTABLISHED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION:
(I) APPLY ONLY TO INITIAL APPLICATIONS TO THE PROGRAM;
AND
(II) MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO AFFECT ELIGIBILITY FOR
CONTINUOUS OR ONGOING COVERAGE.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(1) ESTABLISH PROCEDURES TO NOTIFY APPLICANTS AND
PROVIDERS OF CHANGES IN THE RETROACTIVE ELIGIBILITY POLICY; AND

HOUSE BILL 1331
(2) ENSURE COMPLIANCE WITH ALL FEDERAL AND STATE
REQUIREMENTS REGARDING NOTICE AND DUE PROCESS.
(D) (1) ON OR BEFORE AUGUST 31 EACH YEAR, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
REPORT TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, ON THE IMPLEMENTATION AND IMPACT OF THE
RETROACTIVE BENEFITS LIMITATIONS ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF
THIS SECTION, INCLUDING:
(I) THE NUMBER OF PROGRAM APPLICATIONS PROCESSED
FOR THE EXPANSION POPULATION AND THE NONEXPANSION POPULATION;
(II) THE NUMBER OF PROGRAM RECIPIENTS DENIED
RETROACTIVE BENEFITS BEYOND THE LIMITATIONS ESTABLISHED UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(III) THE ESTIMATED FISCAL IMPACT OF THE LIMITATIONS ON
RETROACTIVE BENEFITS ON THE PROGRAM.
(2) THE REPORT SHALL BE MADE PUBLICLY AVAILABLE ON THE
DEPARTMENT’S WEBSITE.
(E) ANY TAXPAYER IN THE STATE MAY BRING AN ACTION TO ENFORCE THIS
SECTION.
(F) AN ACTION FOR A DECLARATORY JUDGMENT OR INJUNCTIVE RELIEF
MAY BE BROUGHT UNDER THIS SECTION AGAINST THE DEPARTMENT FOR
VIOLATING THIS SECTION.
(G) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SECTION.
15–123.3.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “APPLICABLE PROGRAM RECIPIENT” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO
IS SUBJECT TO WORK REQUIREMENTS UNDER FEDERAL LAW, REGULATION, OR
GUIDANCE.
(3) “WORK REQUIREMENTS” MEANS THE REQUIREMENTS
ESTABLISHED UNDER 42 U.S.C. § 1396A(XX).

HOUSE BILL 1331 9
(B) (1) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2026, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
IMPLEMENT WORK REQUIREMENTS FOR ALL APPLICABLE PROGRAM RECIPIENTS.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REQUIRE DOCUMENTARY EVIDENCE OF
COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT APPROVE AN EXEMPTION FROM THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION FOR AN INDIVIDUAL, BASED ON THE STATUS OF
THE INDIVIDUAL AS MEDICALLY FRAIL OR OTHERWISE BEING AN INDIVIDUAL WITH
SPECIAL MEDICAL NEEDS, UNLESS THE INDIVIDUAL HAS BEEN CERTIFIED AS
HAVING A DISABLING MENTAL DISORDER, A PHYSICAL, INTELLECTUAL, OR
DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITY THAT SIGNIFICANTLY IMPAIRS THE INDIVIDUAL’S
ABILITY TO PERFORM ACTIVITIES OF DAILY LIVING, OR IS IN TREATMENT FOR A
CHRONIC SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER, BY:
(1) A PHYSICIAN;
(2) A PHYSICIAN’S ASSISTANT;
(3) A NURSE;
(4) A NURSE PRACTITIONER;
(5) A REPRESENTATIVE OF A PHYSICIAN’S OFFICE AUTHORIZED TO
PROVIDE THE CERTIFICATION;
(6) A PSYCHOLOGIST; OR
(7) A SOCIAL WORKER.
(D) THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT:
(1) EXPAND THE DESCRIPTION OF AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS MEDICALLY
FRAIL OR OTHERWISE AN INDIVIDUAL WITH SPECIAL MEDICAL NEEDS BEYOND THE
SCOPE ESTABLISHED UNDER 42 C.F.R. § 440.315(F);
(2) SEEK OR IMPLEMENT AN ADDITIONAL EXEMPTION TO WORK
REQUIREMENTS UNLESS SPECIFICALLY AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS TITLE; OR
(3) AUTHORIZE A MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION TO DETERMINE
WHETHER A PROGRAM RECIPIENT IS EXEMPT FROM THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS
SECTION.

HOUSE BILL 1331
(E) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL TERMINATE THE ELIGIBILITY OF A PROGRAM
RECIPIENT WHO IS SUBJECT TO THE WORK REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION AND
FAILS TO COMPLY.
(F) BEGINNING MARCH 31, 2027, AND ON A QUARTERLY BASIS
THEREAFTER, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY ON:
(1) THE NUMBER AND TYPE OF WORK REQUIREMENT EXEMPTIONS
GRANTED TO PROGRAM RECIPIENTS; AND
(2) THE IMPACT OF THOSE EXEMPTIONS ON PROGRAM ENROLLMENT.
15–123.4.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “QUALIFIED CITIZEN” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS
A RESIDENT OF THE UNITED STATES AND WHO IS:
(1) A CITIZEN OR IS OTHERWISE A NATIONAL OF THE UNITED STATES;
(2) AN ALIEN LAWFULLY ADMITTED FOR PERMANENT RESIDENCE AS
AN IMMIGRANT;
(3) AN ALIEN WHO HAS BEEN GRANTED THE STATUS OF CUBAN OR
HAITIAN ENTRANT, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 501(E) OF THE REFUGEE EDUCATION
ASSISTANCE ACT OF 1980; OR
(4) AN INDIVIDUAL LAWFULLY RESIDING IN THE UNITED STATES IN
ACCORDANCE WITH A COMPACT OF FREE ASSOCIATION, AS APPLICABLE UNDER 8
U.S.C. § 1612(B)(2)(G).
(B) (1) THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT PROVIDE COVERAGE UNDER THE
PROGRAM TO AN INDIVIDUAL UNLESS THE INDIVIDUAL IS A QUALIFIED CITIZEN.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REQUIRE THAT INCOME OF INELIGIBLE
HOUSEHOLD MEMBERS BE INCLUDED WHEN CALCULATING FINANCIAL ELIGIBILITY
FOR THE PROGRAM.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL INCLUDE AN IMMIGRATION STATUS FIELD ON
ALL APPLICATIONS FOR PROGRAM SERVICES.

HOUSE BILL 1331 11
(D) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(1) VERIFY WHETHER AN INDIVIDUAL IS A QUALIFIED CITIZEN
BEFORE PROGRAM ENROLLMENT;
(2) CONDUCT REGULAR CROSS–CHECKS OF APPLICANT AND
PROGRAM RECIPIENT INFORMATION AGAINST FEDERAL DATABASES, INCLUDING
THE SYSTEMATIC ALIEN VERIFICATION FOR ENTITLEMENTS PROGRAM; AND
(3) PROMPTLY REFER ALL APPLICANTS IDENTIFIED AS AN
INDIVIDUAL WHO DOES NOT HAVE LAWFUL IMMIGRATION STATUS TO THE U.S.
DEPARTMENT OF HOMELAND SECURITY OR OTHER APPROPRIATE FEDERAL
AUTHORITIES.
(E) THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO AFFECT COVERAGE FOR
EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES PROVIDED TO ALL INDIVIDUALS AS REQUIRED
UNDER 42 U.S.C. § 1396B(V).
Article – Human Services
5–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Department” means the Department of Human Services.
(g) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Human Services.
5–501.
(a) (1) The Department may implement a Supplemental Nutrition Assistance
Program in accordance with the federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program.
(2) The Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program shall include:
(i) a Restaurant Meals Program in accordance with § 5–505 of this
subtitle; and
(ii) a Heat and Eat Program in accordance with § 5–506 of this
subtitle.
(b) The State shall bear the nonfederal portion of the administrative costs of the
Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program for each county.

HOUSE BILL 1331
(c) Each local department shall administer the Supplemental Nutrition
Assistance Program:
(1) under the supervision and control of the Department; and
(2) in accordance with the regulations of the Department and federal law.
(d) If a household includes an individual who is at least 60 years old and receives
a federally funded benefit in an amount less than $50 per month under the Supplemental
Nutrition Assistance Program, the State shall provide a supplement to increase the total
benefit to $50 per month.
(E) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH MEMORANDUMS OF
UNDERSTANDING WITH FEDERAL AND STATE AGENCIES TO FACILITATE
DATA–SHARING IN ORDER TO CONDUCT:
(I) MONTHLY DEATH RECORD REVIEWS USING THE VITAL
STATISTICS ADMINISTRATION DATABASE TO IDENTIFY DECEASED INDIVIDUALS
RECEIVING BENEFITS UNDER THE SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION ASSISTANCE
PROGRAM;
(II) QUARTERLY REVIEWS, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE
MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF LABOR, TO DETERMINE THE EFFECT OF EMPLOYMENT
OR WAGE CHANGES OF HOUSEHOLDS RECEIVING BENEFITS UNDER THE
SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION ASSISTANCE PROGRAM;
(III) MONTHLY REVIEWS OF OUT–OF–STATE ELECTRONIC
BENEFITS TRANSFER CARD TRANSACTIONS TO VERIFY THAT INDIVIDUALS
RECEIVING BENEFITS UNDER THE SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION ASSISTANCE
PROGRAM RESIDE IN THE STATE;
(IV) QUARTERLY REVIEWS OF TAX FILINGS FROM THE
COMPTROLLER TO IDENTIFY INCOME CHANGES OF HOUSEHOLDS RECEIVING
BENEFITS UNDER THE SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION ASSISTANCE PROGRAM;
(V) MONTHLY REVIEWS OF INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS, IN
CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND CORRECTIONAL
SERVICES, TO:
1. ENSURE THAT INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS ARE NOT
RECEIVING BENEFITS UNDER THE SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION ASSISTANCE
PROGRAM; AND

HOUSE BILL 1331 13
2. DETERMINE THE EFFECT OF AN INDIVIDUAL’S
INCARCERATION ON HOUSEHOLDS RECEIVING BENEFITS UNDER THE
SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION ASSISTANCE PROGRAM;
(VI) TWICE MONTHLY REVIEWS OF UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE
BENEFITS, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF LABOR, TO
VERIFY CHANGES IN EMPLOYMENT OR INCOME ELIGIBILITY OF A HOUSEHOLD
RECEIVING BENEFITS UNDER THE SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION ASSISTANCE
PROGRAM USING THE FOLLOWING:
1. SOCIAL SECURITY ADMINISTRATION EARNINGS,
SUPPLEMENTAL SECURITY INCOME, BENEFICIARY, PENSION, AND DEATH
RECORDS;
2. U.S. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN
SERVICES NATIONAL DIRECTORY OF NEW HIRES;
3. U.S. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN
SERVICES CHILD SUPPORT ENFORCEMENT RECORDS;
4. U.S. DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND URBAN
DEVELOPMENT PAYMENT AND EARNINGS DATA; AND
5. FEDERAL BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION NATIONAL
INSTANT CRIMINAL BACKGROUND CHECK SYSTEM RECORDS OF FUGITIVES FROM
JUSTICE; AND
(VII) MONTHLY REVIEWS OF ADDRESS INFORMATION TO
DETERMINE CHANGES IN RESIDENCY THAT MAY AFFECT CONTINUING ELIGIBILITY
OF INDIVIDUALS RECEIVING BENEFITS UNDER THE SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM USING:
1. RETURNED MAIL; AND
2. U.S. POSTAL SERVICE CHANGE OF ADDRESS DATA.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT MAY CONTRACT WITH A THIRD PARTY TO
CONDUCT PUBLIC AND PRIVATE DATABASE SEARCHES FOR INFORMATION THAT
INDICATES A CHANGE IN CIRCUMSTANCES THAT MAY AFFECT ELIGIBILITY FOR
BENEFITS UNDER THE SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION ASSISTANCE PROGRAM.
(3) (I) WHEN DETERMINING ELIGIBILITY FOR BENEFITS UNDER
THE SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION ASSISTANCE PROGRAM, THE DEPARTMENT MAY

HOUSE BILL 1331
NOT APPLY CATEGORICAL ELIGIBILITY UNDER 7 U.S.C. § 2014(A) OR 7 C.F.R. §
273.2(J)(2)(III), UNLESS REQUIRED BY FEDERAL LAW.
(II) WHEN DETERMINING ELIGIBILITY FOR BENEFITS UNDER
THE SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION ASSISTANCE PROGRAM, UNLESS REQUIRED BY
FEDERAL LAW, THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT:
1. APPLY A HIGHER GROSS INCOME ELIGIBILITY
STANDARD THAN THE GROSS INCOME ELIGIBILITY UNDER 7 U.S.C. § 2014(C); OR
2. ALLOW FINANCIAL RESOURCES GREATER THAN
THOSE SPECIFIED IN 7 U.S.C. § 2014(G).
(4) A HOUSEHOLD ELIGIBLE TO RECEIVE BENEFITS UNDER THE
SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION ASSISTANCE PROGRAM UNDER FEDERAL AND STATE
LAW SHALL REPORT A CHANGE IN CIRCUMSTANCES AFFECTING ELIGIBILITY WITHIN
10 DAYS AFTER THE CHANGE OCCURRED, IN ACCORDANCE WITH 7 C.F.R. §
273.12(A)(1).
(5) IF THE DEPARTMENT RECEIVES INFORMATION CONCERNING AN
INDIVIDUAL RECEIVING BENEFITS UNDER THE SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM THAT INDICATES A CHANGE IN CIRCUMSTANCES THAT MAY
AFFECT ELIGIBILITY, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REVIEW THE INDIVIDUAL’S OR
HOUSEHOLD’S ELIGIBILITY.
(6) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ASSIGN REGULAR RECERTIFICATION
PERIODS OF NOT GREATER THAN 4 MONTHS, BUT NOT LESS THAN 3 MONTHS, TO
HOUSEHOLDS:
(I) WITH ZERO NET INCOME;
(II) THAT INCLUDE AN ABLE–BODIED ADULT WITHOUT
DEPENDENTS; AND
(III) WHOSE CIRCUMSTANCES ARE DETERMINED BY THE
DEPARTMENT TO BE UNSTABLE.
(7) THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH LAW ENFORCEMENT
AGENCIES, SHALL CONDUCT ANNUAL ON–SITE INSPECTIONS OF RETAIL FACILITIES
ACCEPTING ELECTRONIC BENEFITS TRANSFER CARD TRANSACTIONS TO IDENTIFY
POTENTIAL FRAUD.

HOUSE BILL 1331 15
(8) (I) THE DEPARTMENT AND THE STATE LOTTERY AND GAMING
CONTROL AGENCY SHALL ENTER INTO AN AGREEMENT TO IDENTIFY THE NAMES OF
EACH RECIPIENT OF BENEFITS UNDER THE SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM WHO HAS WON A PRIZE OF $600 OR MORE.
(II) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL INVESTIGATE WHETHER A
HOUSEHOLD EXCEEDS RESOURCE ELIGIBILITY UNDER 7 C.F.R. § 273.8(B) OR 7
U.S.C. § 2014(G)(1).
(9) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PUBLISH ON ITS WEBSITE QUARTERLY
REPORTS ON INVESTIGATIONS AND COMPLIANCE FINDINGS RELATING TO
SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION ASSISTANCE PROGRAM FRAUD, INCLUDING:
(I) THE NUMBER OF HOUSEHOLDS INVESTIGATED;
(II) THE NUMBER OF INDIVIDUALS REFERRED FOR
PROSECUTION;
(III) THE TOTAL NUMBER AND AMOUNT OF IMPROPER PAYMENTS
RECOVERED;
(IV) THE PERCENTAGE OF INELIGIBLE RECIPIENTS IDENTIFIED;
AND
(V) THE TOTAL EXPENDITURE OF FUNDS ON OUT–OF–STATE
ELECTRONIC BENEFITS TRANSFER CARD TRANSACTIONS.
(10) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT
THIS SECTION.
5–503.
Subject to the State budget, the Department shall provide food supplement benefits
to a legal immigrant who:
(1) is a minor;
(2) is ineligible for federally funded Supplemental Nutrition Assistance
Program benefits because of immigration status;
(3) meets all other Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program eligibility
requirements; and
(4) meets any other requirements of the State.

HOUSE BILL 1331
5–503.1.
(A) AN INDIVIDUAL MAY NOT RECEIVE BENEFITS UNDER THE
SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION ASSISTANCE PROGRAM UNLESS THE INDIVIDUAL IS A
RESIDENT OF THE UNITED STATES AND IS:
(1) A CITIZEN OR NATIONAL OF THE UNITED STATES;
(2) AN ALIEN LAWFULLY ADMITTED FOR PERMANENT RESIDENCE AS
AN IMMIGRANT;
(3) AN ALIEN WHO HAS BEEN GRANTED THE STATUS OF CUBAN OR
HAITIAN ENTRANT, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 501(E) OF THE REFUGEE EDUCATION
ASSISTANCE ACT OF 1980; OR
(4) AN INDIVIDUAL LAWFULLY RESIDING IN THE UNITED STATES IN
ACCORDANCE WITH A COMPACT OF FREE ASSOCIATION, AS APPLICABLE UNDER 8
U.S.C. § 1612(B)(2)(G).
(B) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL VERIFY THAT AN INDIVIDUAL IS
ELIGIBLE TO RECEIVE BENEFITS UNDER THE SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM UNDER 7 U.S.C. § 2015(F) AND SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION BY REQUIRING AN INDIVIDUAL TO PROVIDE PROOF OF CITIZENSHIP OR
ELIGIBLE ALIEN STATUS BY PROVIDING DOCUMENTATION, INCLUDING:
(I) A BIRTH OR HOSPITAL RECORD;
(II) A VOTER REGISTRATION CARD;
(III) A U.S. PASSPORT; AND
(IV) U.S. CUSTOMS AND IMMIGRATION SERVICE
DOCUMENTATION.
(2) (I) IF AN INDIVIDUAL IS ELIGIBLE TO RECEIVE BENEFITS
UNDER THE SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION ASSISTANCE PROGRAM UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION AND IS NOT A CITIZEN OR NATIONAL OF THE
UNITED STATES, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL VERIFY THE INDIVIDUAL’S STATUS
USING THE SYSTEMATIC ALIEN VERIFICATION FOR ENTITLEMENTS ONLINE
SERVICE.

HOUSE BILL 1331 17
(II) ON A MONTHLY BASIS, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ASSESS
THE CONTINUED ELIGIBILITY OF AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS NOT A CITIZEN OR
NATIONAL OF THE UNITED STATES USING THE SYSTEMATIC ALIEN VERIFICATION
FOR ENTITLEMENTS ONLINE SERVICE OR ANY OTHER FEDERAL DATABASE USED TO
DETERMINE CITIZENSHIP OR IMMIGRATION STATUS.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL SUBMIT TO THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF
AGRICULTURE INFORMATION CONCERNING ANY INDIVIDUAL FOR WHOM THE
DEPARTMENT IS UNABLE TO VERIFY ELIGIBLE IMMIGRATION STATUS UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION, REGARDLESS OF WHETHER THE INDIVIDUAL IS
APPLYING FOR BENEFITS UNDER THE SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION ASSISTANCE
PROGRAM.
(D) (1) WHEN DETERMINING THE ELIGIBILITY AND BENEFIT AMOUNT
FOR ANY HOUSEHOLD APPLYING FOR BENEFITS UNDER THE SUPPLEMENTAL
NUTRITION ASSISTANCE PROGRAM, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL INCLUDE THE
INCOME AND FINANCIAL RESOURCES OF ANY INDIVIDUAL IN THE HOUSEHOLD WHO
IS INELIGIBLE TO RECEIVE BENEFITS UNDER THE SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM UNDER 7 U.S.C. § 2015(F) AND SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION.
(2) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OPTIONS PROVIDED UNDER 7 C.F.R. §
273.11(C)(3), THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT PRORATE OR EXCLUDE THE INCOME OR
FINANCIAL RESOURCES OF INELIGIBLE INDIVIDUALS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, if any provision of this Act or
the application of any provision of this Act to any person or circumstance is held invalid for
any reason in a court of competent jurisdiction, the invalidity does not affect other
provisions or any other application of this Act that can be given effect without the invalid
provision or application, and for this purpose the provisions of this Act are declared
severable.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.